Illinois, session 104th, HB2754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-13-1.1, 11-13-3.1, 11-13-10, 11-13-14, 6and 11-13-14.1 and by adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-1.1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-1.1)8    Sec. 11-13-1.1. The corporate authorities of any 9municipality may in its ordinances passed under the authority 10of this Division 13 provide for the classification of special 11uses. Such uses may include but are not limited to public and 12quasi-public uses affected with the public interest, uses 13which may have a unique, special or unusual impact upon the use 14or enjoyment of neighboring property, and planned 15developments. A use may be a permitted use in one or more 16zoning districts, and a special use in one or more other zoning 17districts. A special use shall be permitted only after a 18public hearing before some commission or committee designated 19by the corporate authorities, with prior notice thereof given 20in the manner as provided in Section 11-13-6 and 11-13-7. Any 21notice required by this Section need not include a metes and 22bounds legal description of the area classified for special 23uses, provided that the notice includes: (i) the common street   HB2754 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1address or addresses and (ii) the property index number 2("PIN") or numbers of all the parcels of real property 3contained in the area classified for special uses. A special 4use shall be permitted only upon evidence that such use meets 5standards established for such classification in the 6ordinances, and the granting of permission therefor may be 7subject to conditions reasonably necessary to meet such 8standards. In addition, any proposed special use which fails 9to receive the approval of the commission or committee 10designated by the corporate authorities to hold the public 11hearing shall not be approved by the corporate authorities 12except by a favorable majority vote of all municipal 13executives, alderpersons, commissioners, or trustees of the 14municipality then holding office; however, the corporate 15authorities may by ordinance increase the vote requirement to 16two-thirds of all alderpersons, commissioners or trustees of 17the municipality then holding office.18(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 19    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-3.1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-3.1)20    Sec. 11-13-3.1. In municipalities of less than 500,000 21inhabitants, no change shall be made in the zoning ordinance 22nor shall any zoning variation be granted within 6 months 23after the date upon which an official plan is adopted by the 24corporate authorities unless such change in the zoning 25ordinance or such variation is approved by a simple majority   HB2754 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1two-thirds vote of the corporate authorities or the zoning 2board of appeals then holding office, as the case may be.3(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3425) 4    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-10)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-10)5    Sec. 11-13-10. In municipalities of less than 500,000 6population, where a variation is to be made by ordinance, upon 7the report of the board of appeals, the corporate authorities, 8by ordinance, without further public hearing, may adopt any 9proposed variation or may refer it back to the board for 10further consideration, and any proposed variation which fails 11to receive the approval of the board of appeals shall not be 12passed except by the favorable simple majority vote of 13two-thirds of all municipal executives, alderpersons, or 14trustees of the municipality.15(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 16    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-14)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-14)17    Sec. 11-13-14. The regulations imposed and the districts 18created under the authority of this Division 13 may be amended 19from time to time by ordinance after the ordinance 20establishing them has gone into effect, but no such amendments 21shall be made without a hearing before some commission or 22committee designated by the corporate authorities. Notice 23shall be given of the time and place of the hearing, not more 24than 30 nor less than 15 days before the hearing, by publishing   HB2754 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1a notice thereof at least once in one or more newspapers 2published in the municipality, or, if no newspaper is 3published therein, then in one or more newspapers with a 4general circulation within the municipality. In municipalities 5with less than 500 population in which no newspaper is 6published, publication may be made instead by posting a notice 7in 3 prominent places within the municipality. In case of a 8written protest against any proposed amendment of the 9regulations or districts, signed and acknowledged by the 10owners of 20% of the frontage proposed to be altered, or by the 11owners of 20% of the frontage immediately adjoining or across 12an alley therefrom, or by the owners of the 20% of the frontage 13directly opposite the frontage proposed to be altered, is 14filed with the clerk of the municipality, the amendment shall 15not be passed except by a favorable simple majority vote of 16two-thirds of the municipal executives, alderpersons, or 17trustees of the municipality then holding office. In such 18cases, a copy of the written protest shall be served by the 19protestor or protestors on the applicant for the proposed 20amendments and a copy upon the applicant's attorney, if any, 21by certified mail at the address of such applicant and 22attorney shown in the application for the proposed amendment. 23Any notice required by this Section need not include a metes 24and bounds legal description, provided that the notice 25includes: (i) the common street address or addresses and (ii) 26the property index number ("PIN") or numbers of all the   HB2754 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1parcels of real property contained in the affected area. 2(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 3    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-14.1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-14.1)4    Sec. 11-13-14.1. Notwithstanding any other provision to 5the contrary in this Division 13:6    (A) The corporate authorities of any municipality may by 7ordinance establish the position of hearing officer and 8delegate to a hearing officer the authority to: (i) conduct 9any public hearing -- other than a public hearing provided for 10in Section 11-13-2 -- required to be held under this Division 1113 in connection with applications for any special use, 12variation, amendment or other change or modification in any 13ordinance of the municipality adopted pursuant to this 14Division 13; and (ii) hear and decide appeals from and review 15any order, requirement, decision or determination made by an 16administrative official charged with the enforcement of any 17ordinance adopted pursuant to this Division 13.18    (B) When a hearing officer is designated to conduct a 19public hearing in a matter otherwise required to be heard in 20accordance with this Division 13 by some commission or 21committee designated by the corporate authorities of the 22municipality: (i) notice of such hearing shall be given in the 23same time and manner as is provided by this Division 13 for the 24giving of notice of hearing when any such matter is to be heard 25by some commission or committee designated by the corporate   HB2754 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1authorities; (ii) the hearing officer shall exercise and 2perform the same powers and duties as such commission or 3committee is required to exercise and perform when conducting 4a public hearing in any such matter; and (iii) the hearing 5officer shall render a written recommendation to the corporate 6authorities within such time and in such manner and form as the 7corporate authorities shall require.8    (C) When a hearing officer is designated to conduct a 9public hearing in a matter otherwise required to be heard in 10accordance with this Division 13 by the board of appeals, or 11when a hearing officer is designated to hear and decide 12appeals from and review any order, requirement, decision or 13determination made by an administrative official charged with 14the enforcement of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this 15Division 13: (i) notice of hearing shall be given in the same 16time and manner as is provided by this Division 13 for the 17giving of notice of hearing when any such matter is to be heard 18by the board of appeals; (ii) the hearing officer in passing 19upon and determining any matter otherwise within the 20jurisdiction of the board of appeals shall be governed by all 21of the standards, rules and conditions imposed by this 22Division 13 to govern the board of appeals when it passes upon 23and determines any such matter; and (iii) the hearing officer 24shall exercise and perform all of the powers and duties of the 25board of appeals in the same manner and to the same effect as 26provided in this Division 13 with respect to the board of   HB2754 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1appeals, provided that:2    1. When the hearing officer is passing upon an application 3for variation or special use and the power to determine and 4approve such variation or special use is reserved to the 5corporate authorities, then upon report of the hearing officer 6the corporate authorities may by ordinance without further 7public hearing adopt any proposed variation or special use or 8may refer it back to the hearing officer for further 9consideration, and any proposed variation or special use which 10fails to receive the approval of the hearing officer shall not 11be passed except by the favorable simple majority vote of 2/3 12of all municipal executives, alderpersons, alderperson or 13trustees of the municipality;14    2. When the hearing officer is passing upon an application 15for variation or special use and the power to determine and 16approve such variation or special use is not reserved to the 17corporate authorities, or when the hearing officer is hearing 18and deciding appeals from or reviewing any order, requirement, 19decision or determination made by an administrative official 20charged with the enforcement of any ordinance adopted pursuant 21to this Division 13, the determination made by the hearing 22officer with respect to any such matter shall constitute a 23final administrative decision which is subject to judicial 24review pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative 25Review Law", as now or hereafter amended.26    (D) The corporate authorities of the municipality may   HB2754 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1provide general or specific rules implementing but not 2inconsistent with the provisions of this Section, including 3rules relative to the time and manner in which hearing 4officers are designated to conduct public hearings and rules 5governing the manner in which such hearings are conducted and 6matters heard therein passed upon and determined.7    (E) Hearing officers shall be appointed on the basis of 8training and experience which qualifies them to conduct 9hearings, make recommendations or findings of fact and 10conclusions on the matters heard and otherwise exercise and 11perform the powers, duties and functions delegated in 12accordance with this Section. Hearing officers shall receive 13such compensation as the corporate authorities of the 14municipality shall provide, and any municipality may establish 15a schedule of fees to defray the costs of providing a hearing 16officer.17    (F) This Section is intended to furnish an alternative or 18supplemental procedure which a municipality in its discretion 19may provide for hearing, determining, reviewing and deciding 20matters which arise under any ordinance adopted by the 21municipality pursuant to this Division 13, but nothing in this 22Section shall be deemed to limit or prevent the use of any 23existing procedure available to a municipality under this 24Division 13 for hearing, approving or denying applications for 25a special use, variation, amendment or other change or 26modification of any such ordinance, or for hearing and   HB2754 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 12031 RTM 22126 b1deciding appeals from and reviewing any order, requirement, 2decision or determination made by an administrative official 3charged with the enforcement of any such ordinance.4(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 5    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)6    Sec. 11-13-30. Municipal executives to participate in 7zoning decisions. Notwithstanding any provision of this Act, 8all municipal executives, including mayors, village 9presidents, and chief executive officers, shall have the right 10to vote in all council or board decisions affecting the zoning 11of the municipality.